Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.280

Organization—Holding over by incumbent officials and employees.

Councilmembers shall take office at the times provided by RCW 35.18.270 as now or hereafter amended. The other city officials and employees who are incumbent at the time the council-manager plan takes effect shall hold office until their successors have been selected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2033; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.280. Prior: 1943 c 271 s 8, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-17, part.]